parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST2/src/lex-brands.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8	[€äàáâ]
!# CONTENT:     brand names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    PORTUGUESE
!#
!# CREATED:	14-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# ADD/lexBrands.xip
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# NOTE: names from XIP lexicons are  missing gender ("XSG")
!# 	 may require further classification
!# ============================================================================


Multichar_Symbols

+Noun +Prop +Adj 

+Brand


+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Postmod
+Acron +Abbr


! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space

^]	! lemma boundary (for inflecting proper names)



!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT 

!//==============================================================================
!// Cars  (some compound names are defined in the file LGCulture.xip)
!//==============================================================================

alfa% romeu+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Acer+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Advance+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Agfa+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Alcatel+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Apple+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Asus+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Audi+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Benk+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Bentley+Prop+Brand		XSG;
BMW+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Bugatti+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Cagiva+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Canon+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Casio+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Chevrolet+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Citroen+Prop+Brand		XSG;
City% desk+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Citydesk+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Coca-cola+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Coca-Cola+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Compaq+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Creative+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Daihatsu+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Epson+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Ferrari+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Fiat+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Fijifilm+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Ford+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Gilera+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Grundig+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Harley-Davidson+Prop+Brand	XSG;
Hitachi+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Honda+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Hp+Prop+Brand			XSG;
HP+Prop+Brand			XSG;
IBM+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Ipod+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Iriver+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Jaguar+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Jeep+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Jvc+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Kawasaki+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Kia+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Kodak+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Konica+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Konica-minolta+Prop+Brand	XSG;
Lamborghini+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Lância+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Lg+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Logitech+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Lotus+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Macintosh+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Maserati+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Maxell+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Mazda+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Mercedes+Prop+Brand		XSG;
MG+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Microsoft+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Minolta+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Mitsubishi+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Motorola+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Mustek+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Nikon+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Nissan+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Nokia+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Olypmus+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Opel+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Panasonic+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Pentax+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Peugeot+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Philips+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Piaggio+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Pionner+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Porsche+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Renault+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Ricoh+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Rolls-Royce+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Rover+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Samsung+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Sandisk+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Sanyo+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Sharp+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Siemens+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Sigma+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Smart+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Sony+Prop+Brand			XSG;
Sony-Ericsson+Prop+Brand	XSG;
Suzuki+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Toshiba+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Toyota+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Triumph+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Trust+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Volkswagen+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Volvo+Prop+Brand		XSG;
Windows+Prop+Brand		XSG;
